Missouri, session 2026, SB945.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 57.540, 476.055, 478.003, 478.385, 478.387, 478.550, 478.600,
478.630, 478.700, 478.705, 483.082, 487.020, 488.012, 488.027, 488.426, and 509.520,
RSMo, are repealed and eighteen new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as
sections 57.540, 476.055, 478.003, 478.385, 478.387, 478.550, 478.600, 478.630, 478.700,
478.705, 483.005, 483.082, 487.020, 488.012, 488.027, 488.426, 509.520, and 610.144, to
read as follows:
57.540. 1. The sheriff of the City of St. Louis may employ an attorney at law to aid
and advise him in the discharge of his duties and to represent him in court[, which said
attorney shall be known as "sheriff's attorney", and who shall receive as compensation for his
services as such sheriff's attorney a sum of not less than three thousand dollars and not more
than fifteen thousand dollars per annum, payable in semimonthly installments]. The sheriff
shall set the compensation for an attorney hired pursuant to this section and such
compensation shall be paid out of the same funds and revenue as the sheriff of such city is
paid.
2. The attorney employed by a sheriff pursuant to subsection 1 of this section
shall be employed at the pleasure of the sheriff.
476.055. 1. There is hereby established in the state treasury the "Statewide Court
Automation Fund". All moneys collected pursuant to section 488.027, as well as gifts,
contributions, devises, bequests, and grants received relating to statewide court automation
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS SB 945 2
[of judicial record keeping], and moneys received by the [judicial system] judiciary for the
dissemination of information [and], sales of publications, or other provision of electronic
services developed relating to statewide court automation [of judicial record keeping], as
authorized by the court automation committee, shall be credited to the fund. Moneys
credited to this fund may only be used for the purposes set forth in this section and as
appropriated by the general assembly. Any unexpended balance remaining in the statewide
court automation fund at the end of each biennium shall not be subject to the provisions of
section 33.080 requiring the transfer of such unexpended balance to general revenue.
2. The statewide court automation fund shall be administered by a court automation
committee consisting of the following[: the chief justice of the supreme court,] members:
(1) A judge from the court of appeals, four circuit judges, four associate circuit
judges, four employees of [the circuit court,] circuit courts, and two employees who work
full time in a municipal division of a circuit court, [the commissioner of administration,] each
of whom shall be appointed by the chief justice of the Missouri supreme court;
(2) Two members of the Missouri Bar, appointed by the board of governors of
the Missouri Bar;
(3) Two members of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the
house, with one member being from the majority party and one member being from the
minority party;
(4) Two members of the senate appointed by the president pro [tem] tempore of the
senate, with one member being from the majority party and one member being from the
minority party; and
(5) Four additional ex officio members as follows:
(a) The chief justice of the Missouri supreme court, or the chief justice's
designee;
(b) The commissioner of administration, or the commissioner's designee;
(c) The executive director of the Missouri [Office of Prosecution Services,] office of
prosecution services, or the executive director's designee; and
(d) The director of the state public defender system, [and two members of the
Missouri Bar. The judge members and employee members shall be appointed by the chief
justice. The commissioner of administration shall serve ex officio. The members of the
Missouri Bar shall be appointed by the board of governors of the Missouri Bar. Any member
of the committee may designate another person to serve on the committee in place of the
committee member] or the director's designee.

The appointed members of the committee shall serve for terms of two years and until
their successors are appointed and qualified. The members of the committee shall be

HCS SB 945 3
reimbursed from the statewide court automation fund for their actual expenses in
performing their official duties on the committee.
3. The committee shall develop and [implement a plan for] maintain a statewide
court automation system. The committee shall have the authority to hire consultants, review
systems in other jurisdictions,and purchase goods and services to administer the provisions of
this section. The committee may implement [one or more] pilot projects in the state [for the
purposes of determining the feasibility of developing and implementing such plan. The
members of the committee shall be reimbursed from the court automation fund for their actual
expenses in performing their official duties on the committee] at any time.
4. Any purchase of computer software or computer hardware that exceeds five
thousand dollars shall be made pursuant to the requirements of the office of administration for
lowest and best bid. Such bids shall be subject to acceptance by the office of administration.
The court automation committee shall determine the specifications for such bids.
5. The court automation committee shall not require any circuit court to change any
operating system in such court, unless the committee provides all [necessary] personnel,
funds, and equipment necessary to effectuate the required changes. No judicial circuit or
county may be reimbursed for any costs incurred pursuant to this subsection unless such
judicial circuit or county has the approval of the court automation committee prior to
incurring the specific cost.
6. [Any] The court automation system, including any pilot project, shall be
[implemented,] operated and maintained in accordance with strict standards for the security
and privacy of confidential judicial records, as provided by supreme court rule. Any
person who knowingly releases information from a confidential judicial record is guilty of a
class B misdemeanor. Any person who, knowing that a judicial record is confidential, uses
information from such confidential record for financial gain is guilty of a class E felony.
7. [On the first day of February, May, August and November] No later than the
fifteenth of January of each year, the court automation committee shall electronically file a
report on the progress of the statewide court automation system with the chairs of the
following committees:
(1) The [chair of the] house budget committee, or its successor committee;
(2) The [chair of the] senate appropriations committee, or its successor committee;
(3) The [chair of the] house judiciary committee, or its successor committee; and
(4) The [chair of the] senate judiciary committee, or its successor committee.
[8. The court automation committee established pursuant to this section may continue
to function until completion of its duties prescribed by this section.]
478.003. 1. In any judicial circuit of this state, a majority of the judges of the circuit
court may designate a judge to hear cases arising in the circuit subject to the provisions of

HCS SB 945 4
sections 478.001 to 478.009. In lieu thereof and subject to appropriations or other funds
available for such purpose, a majority of the judges of the circuit court may appoint a person
or persons to act as treatment court commissioners. Each commissioner shall be appointed
for a term of four years, but may be removed at any time by a majority of the judges of the
circuit court. The qualifications, compensation, and retirement benefits of the commissioner
shall be the same as that of an associate circuit judge. If the compensation of a commissioner
appointed pursuant to this section is provided from other than state funds, the source of such
fund shall pay to and reimburse the state for the actual costs of the salary and benefits of the
commissioner. The commissioner shall have all the powers and duties of a circuit judge,
except that any order, judgment or decree of the commissioner shall be confirmed or rejected
by an associate circuit or circuit judge by order of record entered within the time the judge
could set aside such order, judgment or decree had the same been made by the judge. If so
confirmed, the order, judgment or decree shall have the same effect as if made by the judge on
the date of its confirmation.
2. The Missouri supreme court may assign a treatment court commissioner to serve in
the treatment court division of a circuit other than the circuit in which the commissioner is
appointed. The transfer shall only be ordered with the consent and approval of the presiding
judge of the circuit to which the commissioner is to be assigned.
3. A treatment court commissioner may serve as a commissioner in any treatment
court as designated by the treatment court coordinating commission, subject to local court
rules.
4. In each circuit having a treatment court division that has neither a treatment
court administrator nor a treatment court commissioner, the court shall employ a
treatment court administrator, subject to appropriations or other funds available for
such purpose. If the compensation of an administrator employed pursuant to this
subsection is provided from other than state funds, the source of such funds shall pay to
and reimburse the state for the actual costs of the salary and benefits of the
administrator.
478.385. There shall be four circuit judges in the seventh judicial circuit [consisting
of the county of Clay]. Beginning in fiscal year 2028, there shall be five circuit judges in
the seventh judicial circuit.
478.387. There shall be twenty-four circuit judges in the twenty-second judicial
circuit [consisting of the city of St. Louis].
478.550. 1. There shall be four circuit judges in the twenty-third judicial circuit
[consisting of the county of Jefferson]. These judges shall sit in divisions numbered one, two,
three and four. Beginning on January 1, 2007, there shall be six circuit judges in the twenty-
third judicial district and these judges shall sit in divisions numbered one, two, three, four,

HCS SB 945 5
five, and six. The division eleven associate circuit judge position and the division twelve
associate circuit judge shall become circuit judge positions beginning January 1, 2007. The
division eleven associate circuit judge shall be numbered as division five and the division
twelve associate circuit judge shall be numbered as division six.
2. The circuit judge in division three shall be elected in 1980. The circuit judges in
divisions one and four shall be elected in 1982. The circuit judge in division two shall be
elected in 1984. The circuit judges in divisions five and six shall be elected for a six-year
term in 2006.
3. Beginning January 1, 2007, the family court commissioner position in the twenty-
third judicial district appointed under section 487.020 shall become an associate circuit judge
position in all respects and shall be designated as division eleven. This position may retain
the duties and responsibilities with regard to the family court. The associate circuit judge in
division eleven shall be elected in 2006 for a full four-year term. This associate circuit
judgeship shall not be included in the statutory formula for authorizing additional associate
circuit judgeships per county under section 478.320.
4. Beginning January 1, 2007, the treatment court commissioner position in the
twenty-third judicial district appointed under section 478.003 shall become an associate
circuit judge position in all respects and shall be designated as division twelve. This position
may retain the duties and responsibilities with regard to the treatment court. The associate
circuit judge in division twelve shall be elected in 2006 for a full four-year term. This
associate circuit judgeship shall not be included in the statutory formula for authorizing
additional associate circuit judgeships per county under section 478.320.
5. Beginning in fiscal year 2028, there shall be one additional associate circuit
judgeship in the twenty-third judicial circuit. This associate circuit judgeship shall not
be included in the statutory formula for authorizing additional associate circuit
judgeships per county under section 478.320. The governor shall appoint such judge,
and that judge shall serve until January 1, 2029. An associate circuit judge shall be
elected in 2028 and every four years thereafter.
478.600. 1. There shall be four circuit judges in the eleventh judicial circuit. These
judges shall sit in divisions numbered one, two, three and four. Beginning on January 1,
2007, there shall be six circuit judges in the eleventh judicial circuit and these judges shall sit
in divisions numbered one, two, three, four, five, and seven. The division five associate
circuit judge position and the division seven associate circuit judge position shall become
circuit judge positions beginning January 1, 2007, and shall be numbered as divisions five and
seven. Beginning January 1, 2029, there shall be seven circuit judges in the eleventh
judicial circuit, and these judges shall sit in divisions numbered one, two, three, four,
five, seven, and seventeen.

HCS SB 945 6
2. The circuit judge in division two shall be elected in 1980. The circuit judge in
division four shall be elected in 1982. The circuit judge in division one shall be elected in
1984. The circuit judge in division three shall be elected in 1992. The circuit judges in
divisions five and seven shall be elected for a six-year term in 2006. The circuit judge in
division seventeen shall be elected in 2028 for a two-year term and thereafter in 2030 for
a six-year term and every six years thereafter.
3. Beginning January 1, 2007, the family court commissioner positions in the
eleventh judicial circuit appointed under section 487.020 shall become associate circuit judge
positions in all respects and shall be designated as divisions nine and ten respectively. These
positions may retain the duties and responsibilities with regard to the family court. The
associate circuit judges in divisions nine and ten shall be elected in 2006 for full four-year
terms.
4. Beginning on January 1, 2007, the treatment court commissioner position in the
eleventh judicial circuit appointed under section 478.003 shall become an associate circuit
judge position in all respects. Such associate circuit judge shall be elected in 2006 for a full
four-year term. This associate circuit judgeship shall not be included in the statutory formula
for authorizing additional associate circuit judgeships per county under section 478.320.
5. Beginning in fiscal year 2015, there shall be one additional associate circuit judge
position in the eleventh judicial circuit. The associate circuit judge shall be elected in 2016.
This associate circuit judgeship shall not be included in the statutory formula for authorizing
additional circuit judgeships per county under section 478.320. Beginning in fiscal year
2019, there shall be one additional associate circuit judge position in the eleventh judicial
circuit. The associate circuit judge shall be elected in 2020. This associate circuit judgeship
shall not be included in the statutory formula for authorizing additional circuit judgeships per
county under section 478.320. Beginning in fiscal year 2028, there shall be two additional
associate circuit judge positions in the eleventh judicial circuit. The associate circuit
judges shall be elected in 2028 and every four years thereafter. These associate circuit
judgeships shall not be included in the statutory formula for authorizing additional
associate circuit judgeships per county under section 478.320.
478.630. 1. There shall be two circuit judges in the twentieth judicial circuit
[consisting of the counties of Franklin, Gasconade and Osage]. These judges shall sit in
divisions numbered one and two.
2. The circuit judge in division two shall be elected in 1980. The circuit judge in
division one shall be elected in 1982.
3. Beginning in fiscal year 2028, there shall be one additional associate circuit
judgeship in Franklin County. This associate circuit judgeship shall not be included in
the statutory formula for authorizing additional associate circuit judges per county as

HCS SB 945 7
provided under section 478.320. The governor shall appoint such judge, and that judge
shall serve until January 1, 2029. An associate circuit judge shall be elected in 2028 and
every four years thereafter.
478.700. 1. There shall be [two] three circuit judges in the twenty-fifth judicial
circuit [consisting of the counties of Maries, Phelps, Pulaski and Texas]. These judges shall
sit in divisions numbered one [and], two, and three. These judgeships shall include the
circuit judgeship created in fiscal year 2026 under section 478.330.
2. The circuit judge in division two shall be elected in 1980. The circuit judge in
division one shall be elected in 1982. The circuit judge appointed by the governor in 2025
for division three shall serve until January 1, 2029. A circuit judge for division three
shall be elected in 2028 for a four-year term and in 2032 for a full six-year term and
every six years thereafter.
478.705. 1. There shall be three circuit judges in the twenty-sixth judicial circuit
[consisting of the counties of Camden, Laclede, Miller, Moniteau and Morgan]. These judges
shall sit in divisions numbered one, two, and three.
2. The circuit judge in division two shall be elected in 1980. The circuit judge in
division one shall be elected in 1982. The governor shall appoint a judge for division three
and notwithstanding the provisions of section 105.030, that judge shall serve until January 1,
2021. A judge for division three shall be elected in 2020.
3. Beginning in fiscal year 2028, there shall be one additional associate circuit
judgeship in Miller County. This associate circuit judgeship shall not be included in the
statutory formula for authorizing additional associate circuit judges per county as
provided under section 478.320. The governor shall appoint such judge, and that judge
shall serve until January 1, 2029. An associate circuit judge shall be elected in 2028 and
every four years thereafter.
483.005. As used in this chapter and section 476.055, the following terms mean:
(1) "Case record", all records in a case file relating to a specific case or
controversy, as defined in supreme court rule;
(2) "Confidential information":
(a) The full date of birth of any party or minor child;
(b) The full Social Security number of any party or any minor child;
(c) The driver's license number, state identification number, taxpayer
identification number, and passport number of any party;
(d) The full financial institution account number, credit or debit card number,
personal identification number, or password used to secure any such accounts or cards,
of any party;

HCS SB 945 8
(e) The name and address of any individual who is known to be a minor child
and, if applicable, any next friend of the minor child; or
(f) Any other information sealed, expunged, or closed under statute, supreme
court rule, or order of a court of record;
(3) "Confidential record" or "confidential judicial record", as such term is
defined in Missouri supreme court rules;
(4) "Minor child", a person under eighteen years of age, except for:
(a) An emancipated minor as defined in section 302.178;
(b) A juvenile who has been certified to stand trial as an adult for offenses under
section 211.071; or
(c) A juvenile fifteen and one-half years of age or older who is alleged to have
violated a state or municipal traffic ordinance or regulation.
483.082. 1. Notwithstanding [the provision of] any other [statute] provision of law
to the contrary, it shall be the duty of the clerks of all courts to keep such records of the courts
and in such a manner as may be directed by rule of the supreme court so that they shall
accurately record all essential matters relating to the causes and matters within the jurisdiction
of the court which are and have been pending before the court, including pleadings, motions
and related documents, transactions, orders and judgments or decrees related thereto showing
the course and disposition of causes and matters, the taxing and collection of court costs, and
the setting of trial calendars or dockets of pending cases.
2. Recognizing that improved methods and systems of keeping records and data have
been and will continue to be developed from time to time and that all court clerks should be
empowered to utilize improved methods, systems, and techniques of keeping records of
essential matters, and notwithstanding [the provisions of any other statute] any other
provision of law to the contrary, the methods, form,and systems of keeping all such files and
records shall be as directed and approved by rule of the supreme court.
3. Subject to the provisions of the supreme court rules and the supervisory
jurisdiction of the supreme court, confidential information and confidential records in a
case record shall be maintained so as to be inaccessible to the general public under
supreme court rules governing access to records of the judicial branch of Missouri.
487.020. 1. In each circuit or a county having a family court, a majority of the circuit
and associate circuit judges en banc, in the circuit, may appoint commissioners, subject to
appropriations, to hear family court cases and make findings as provided for in sections
487.010 to 487.190. Any person serving as a commissioner of the juvenile division of the
circuit court on August 28, 1993, shall become a commissioner of the family court. In each
circuit or a county therein having a family court, a majority of the circuit and associate circuit
judges en banc may appoint, in addition to those commissioners serving as commissioners of

HCS SB 945 9
the juvenile division and becoming commissioners of the family court pursuant to the
provisions of sections 487.020 to 487.040, no more than three additional commissioners to
hear family court cases and make findings and recommendations as provided in sections
487.010 to 487.190, except that, beginning in fiscal year 2028, the twenty-fifth judicial
circuit may instead appoint no more than four additional commissioners. The number of
additional commissioners added as a result of the provisions of sections 487.010 to 487.190
may be appointed only to the extent that the state is reimbursed for the salaries of the
commissioners as provided in sections 487.010 to 487.190 or by federal or county funds or by
gifts or grants made for such purposes. A commissioner shall be appointed for a term of four
years. Commissioners appointed pursuant to sections 487.020 to 487.040 shall serve in
addition to circuit judges, associate circuit court judges and commissioners authorized to hear
actions classified under section 487.080.
2. The circuit courts in the seventh judicial circuit, the eleventh judicial circuit, the
thirteenth judicial circuit, and the thirty-first judicial circuit may, in substitution of each
family court commissioner currently appointed pursuant to this section whose salary is
reimbursable, appoint a family court commissioner whose compensation shall be payable by
the state without necessity of reimbursement. The provisions of this subsection shall not be
construed to allow appointment of a family court commissioner in the eleventh judicial circuit
in addition to the number of such family court commissioners holding office in the eleventh
judicial circuit as of January 1, 1999. The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed
to allow appointment of a family court commissioner in the thirteenth judicial circuit or the
thirty-first judicial circuit in addition to the number of such family court commissioners
holding office in such circuits as of January 1, 2013. The provisions of this subsection shall
not be construed to allow appointment of a family court commissioner in the seventh
judicial circuit in addition to the number of such family court commissioners holding
office in the seventh judicial circuit as of January 1, 2027. The appointment of the state-
paid commissioner shall be subject to appropriations for such purpose.
3. Each commissioner of the family court shall possess the same qualifications as a
circuit judge. The compensation and retirement benefits of each commissioner shall be the
same as that of an associate circuit judge, payable in the same manner and from the same
source as that of an associate circuit judge.
488.012. 1. Beginning July 1, 1997, the clerk of each court of this state responsible
for collecting court costs shall collect the court costs authorized by statute, in such amounts as
are authorized by supreme court rule adopted pursuant to sections 488.010 to 488.020. Court
costs due and payable prior to July 1, 1997, shall not be affected by the adoption of this rule.
2. The supreme court shall set the amount of court costs authorized by statute, at
levels to produce revenue which shall not substantially exceed the total of the proportion of

HCS SB 945 10
the costs associated with administration of the judicial system defrayed by fees,
miscellaneous charges and surcharges.
3. Prior to adjustment by the supreme court, the following fees, costs and charges
shall be collected:
(1) Five dollars for the filing of a lien, pursuant to section 429.090;
(2) Ten dollars for maintaining child support enforcement records, pursuant to section
452.345;
(3) Ten dollars for a notice to a judgment creditor of a distributee, pursuant to section
473.618;
(4) Three dollars for receiving and keeping a will, pursuant to section 474.510;
(5) [Seven] Ten dollars for the statewide court automation fund, pursuant to section
488.027;
(6) Twelve dollars for municipal court costs, fifteen dollars for municipal ordinance
violations filed before an associate circuit judge and thirty dollars for applications for a trial
de novo of a municipal ordinance violation, pursuant to section 479.260;
(7) Five dollars for small claims court cases where less than one hundred dollars is in
dispute, and ten dollars in all other small claims court cases, pursuant to section 482.345;
(8) Fifty dollars for appeals, pursuant to section 483.500;
(9) Fifteen dollars in misdemeanor cases where there is no application for trial de
novo, pursuant to section 483.530;
(10) Forty-five dollars for applications for a trial de novo for misdemeanor cases,
pursuant to section 483.530;
(11) Fifteen dollars for each preliminary hearing in felony cases, pursuant to section
483.530;
(12) Thirty dollars for each information or indictment filed in felony cases, pursuant
to section 483.530;
(13) Fifteen dollars for each associate circuit court case filed, and one dollar for each
additional summons issued in such cases, pursuant to section 483.530;
(14) Forty-five dollars for applications for trial de novo from small claims court and
associate circuit court and forty-five dollars for filing of other cases, pursuant to section
483.530;
(15) One dollar and fifty cents for a certificate of naturalization, pursuant to section
483.535;
(16) When letters are applied for in probate proceedings, pursuant to section 483.580,
when the value of the estate is:
(a) Less than $10,000 $ 75.00
(b) From $10,000 to $25,000 115.00

HCS SB 945 11
(c) From $25,000 to $50,000 155.00
(d) From $50,000 to $100,000 245.00
(e) From $100,000 to $500,000 305.00
(f) More than $500,000 365.00;
(17) Thirty dollars for each additional twelve months a decedent's estate remains
open, pursuant to section 483.580;
(18) In proceedings regarding guardianships and conservatorships, pursuant to
section 483.580:
(a) Twenty-five dollars for each grant of letters for guardianship of a minor;
(b) Fifty dollars for each grant of letters for guardianship of an incapacitated person;
(c) Sixty dollars for each grant of letters for guardianship of the person and
conservatorship of the estate of a minor;
(d) Twenty-five dollars for each additional twelve months a conservatorship of a
minor's estate case remains open;
(e) Seventy-five dollars for each grant of letters in guardianship and conservatorship
of incapacitated persons and their estates;
(f) Thirty dollars for each additional twelve months an incapacitated person's case
remains open;
(19) Fifteen dollars for issuing orders refusing to grant letters to a spouse or an
unmarried minor child and thirty dollars for a certified copy of such orders, pursuant to
section 483.580;
(20) In probate proceedings, pursuant to section 483.580:
(a) Thirty-five dollars for the collection of small estates;
(b) Thirty-five dollars for involuntary hospitalization proceedings;
(c) Thirty dollars for proceedings to determine heirship;
(d) Fifteen dollars for assessment of estate taxes where no letters are granted;
(e) Fifty dollars for proceedings for the sale of real estate by a nonresident
conservator;
(f) Forty dollars for proceedings to dispense with administration;
(g) Twenty dollars for proceedings to dispense with conservatorship;
(h) Twenty-five dollars for admitting a will to probate;
(i) One dollar per copied page and one dollar and fifty cents per certificate;
(21) One dollar and fifty cents per page for testimony transcription, pursuant to
section 488.2250;
(22) Fifteen dollars for court reporters, pursuant to section 488.2253;
(23) Three dollars for witness fees per day, and four dollars when the witness must
travel to another county, pursuant to section 491.280.

HCS SB 945 12
488.027. 1. In addition to all other court costs provided by law, in all civil cases filed
in the circuit courts of this state and in all criminal cases including violations of any
municipal or county ordinance heard by an associate circuit judge or any violation of criminal
or traffic laws of this state, including an infraction, a fee in an amount determined pursuant to
sections 488.015 to 488.020 shall be assessed as costs, except that, no such fee shall be
collected in any proceeding involving a violation of an ordinance or state law when a criminal
proceeding or defendant has been dismissed by the court or when costs are waived or are to
be paid by the state, county or municipality.
2. The moneys collected by clerks of the courts pursuant to the provisions of this
section shall be collected and disbursed as provided by sections 488.010 to 488.020. All such
moneys shall be payable to the director of revenue, who shall deposit all amounts collected
pursuant to this section to the credit of the statewide court automation fund which is
established in section 476.055.
3. The assessment of court costs authorized by this section shall apply to all cases
filed on or after September 1, 1994.
4. Beginning July 1, 2027, and on July first of each year thereafter, apart from
any adjustment as provided in section 488.012, the fee authorized under subsection 1 of
this section shall be adjusted annually for inflation based on the Consumer Price Index
for All Urban Consumers, as defined and officially recorded by the United States
Department of Labor or its successor. Such annual adjustment shall apply to all cases
filed on or after July first of the year in which the adjustment was made.
488.426. 1. The judges of the circuit court, en banc, in any circuit in this state may
require any party filing a civil case in the circuit court, at the time of filing the suit, to deposit
with the clerk of the court a surcharge in addition to all other deposits required by law or court
rule. Sections 488.426 to 488.432 shall not apply to proceedings when costs are waived or
are to be paid by the county or state or any city.
2. The surcharge in effect on August 28, 2001, shall remain in effect until changed by
the circuit court. The circuit court in any circuit, except the circuit court in Jackson County,
the circuit court in the city of St. Louis,or the circuit court in any circuit that reimburses the
state for the salaries of family court commissioners under and pursuant to section 487.020,
may change the fee to any amount not to exceed fifteen dollars. The circuit court in Jackson
County, the circuit court in the city of St. Louis, or the circuit court in any circuit that
reimburses the state for the salaries of family court commissioners under and pursuant to
section 487.020 may change the fee to any amount not to exceed twenty dollars. A change in
the fee shall become effective and remain in effect until further changed.
3. Sections 488.426 to 488.432 shall not apply to proceedings when costs are waived
or are paid by the county or state or any city.

HCS SB 945 13
[4. In addition to any fee authorized by subsection 1 of this section, any county of the
first classification with more than one hundred one thousand but fewer than one hundred
fifteen thousand inhabitants may impose an additional fee of ten dollars excluding cases
concerning adoption and those in small claims court. The provisions of this subsection shall
expire on December 31, 2019.]
509.520. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, beginning
August 28, [2023] 2026, pleadings, attachments, or exhibits filed with the court in any case,
as well as any judgments [or orders] issued by the court, [or other records of the court] shall
not include [the following confidential and personal identifying information]:
(1) The full Social Security number of any party or any child who is the subject of
an order of custody or support; or
(2) The full credit card number[, financial institution account number, personal
identification number, or password used to secure an account] or other financial account
number of any party[;
(3) The full motor vehicle operator license number;
(4) Victim information, including the name, address, and other contact information of
the victim;
(5) Witness information, including the name, address, and other contact information
of the witness;
(6) Any other full state identification number;
(7) The name, address, and date of birth of a minor and, if applicable, any next friend;
or
(8) The full date of birth of any party; however, the year of birth shall be made
available, except for a minor.
2. The information provided under subsection 1 of this section shall be provided in a
confidential information filing sheet contemporaneously filed with the court or entered by the
court, which shall not be subject to public inspection or availability.
3. Nothing in this section shall preclude an entity including, but not limited to, a
financial institution, insurer, insurance support organization, or consumer reporting agency
that is otherwise permitted by law to access state court records from using a person's unique
identifying information to match such information contained in a court record to validate that
person's record.
4. The Missouri supreme court shall promulgate rules to administer this section].
[5.] 2. Contemporaneously with the filing of every petition for dissolution of
marriage, legal separation, motion for modification, action to establish paternity, and petition
or motion for support or custody of a minor child, the filing party shall file a confidential case
filing sheet with the court which shall not be subject to public inspection and which provides:

HCS SB 945 14
(1) The name and address of the current employer and the Social Security number of
the petitioner or movant, if a person;
(2) If known to the petitioner or movant, the name and address of the current
employer and the Social Security number of the respondent; and
(3) The names, dates of birth, and Social Security numbers of any children subject to
the action.
[6.] 3. Contemporaneously with the filing of every responsive pleading petition for
dissolution of marriage, legal separation, motion for modification, action to establish
paternity, and petition or motion for support or custody of a minor child, the responding party
shall file a confidential case filing sheet with the court which shall not be subject to public
inspection and which provides:
(1) The name and address of the current employer and the Social Security number of
the responding party, if a person;
(2) If known to the responding party, the name and address of the current employer
and the Social Security number of the petitioner or movant; and
(3) The names, dates of birth, and Social Security numbers of any children subject to
the action.
[7.] 4. The full Social Security number of any party or child subject to an order of
custody or support shall be retained by the court on the confidential case filing sheet or other
confidential record maintained in conjunction with the administration of the case. The full
credit card number or other financial account number of any party may be retained by the
court on a confidential record if it is necessary to maintain the number in conjunction with the
administration of the case.
[8.] 5. Any document described in subsection 1 of this section shall, in lieu of the full
number, include only the last four digits of any such number.
[9.] 6. Except as provided in section 452.430, the clerk shall not be required to redact
any document described in subsection 1 of this section issued or filed before August 28, 2009,
prior to releasing the document to the public.
[10.] 7. For good cause shown, the court may release information contained on the
confidential case filing sheet; except that, any state agency acting under authority of chapter
454 shall have access to information contained herein without court order in carrying out their
official duty.
610.144. 1. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Missouri
Expungement Fund", which shall consist of moneys deposited into the fund from any
source including, but not limited to, gifts, donations, grants, and bequests. The state
treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180,
the state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and,

HCS SB 945 15
upon appropriation, moneys in this fund shall be used solely as provided in subsection 2
of this section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
2. The office of state courts administrator, the department of public safety, and
the information technology services division within the office of administration shall
expend moneys from the fund, upon appropriation, on the statewide court automation
system and the Missouri criminal history record information system established under
sections 43.500 to 43.530 for one or more of the following purposes:
(1) Expenses that may be incurred to develop, establish, maintain, or operate
any information technology equipment, software, systems, or services associated with
the expungement or closing of records under Missouri law, including the development
and implementation of any technology-assisted, state-initiated bulk expungement or
sealing of records under Missouri law; or
(2) The cost of necessary personnel or contractors.
✔